Utah statutes.
76-10-913.   Definitions.
As used in this act:
(1)  "Attempt to monopolize" means action taken without a legitimate business
purpose and with a specific intent of destroying competition or controlling
prices to substantially lessen competition, or creating a monopoly, where
there is a dangerous probability of creating a monopoly.
(2)  "Commodity" includes any product of the soil, any article of merchandise
or trade or commerce, and any other kind of real or personal property.
(3)  "Manufacturer" means the producer or originator of any commodity or
service.
(4)  "Service" includes any activity that is performed in whole or in part for
the purpose of financial gain including, but not limited to, personal service,
professional service, rental, leasing or licensing for use.
(5)  "Trade or commerce" includes all economic activity involving, or relating
to, any commodity, service, or business activity, including the cost of
exchange or transportation.
